District of Columbia statutes.
42-3505.04

Arbitration.

(a)

By mutual consent, the housing provider and tenant may submit for arbitration any dispute not satisfactorily resolved under § 42-3505.03.

(b)

A request for arbitration shall be in writing.

(c)

The Rent Administrator shall designate 3 members of the Division’s staff, other than those who heard the dispute under § 42-3505.03, to serve as a panel of arbitrators.

(d)

The arbitration panel shall issue a written recommendation to resolve the dispute within 10 days of the request.

(e)

Agreements entered into between the housing provider and tenant under the panel’s recommendation shall be approved by the Rent Administrator and shall be binding upon the parties.

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 504, 32 DCR 3089
This section is referenced in § 42-3505.03.
1981 Ed., § 45-2554.